Utah statutes.
9-7-207.   Deposit of state publications.

(1) (a)  Each state agency and political subdivision publishing a digital version of a state publication shall deposit a digital copy with the division.

(b)  Each state agency and political subdivision shall deposit with the division copies of each state publication that it elects to publish in a physical format in the numbers specified by the state librarian.

(c)  The division shall forward two copies of each state publication published in a physical format deposited with it by a state agency to the Library of Congress, one copy to the state archivist, at least one copy to each depository library, and retain two copies.

(2)  Each state agency or political subdivision shall deposit with the division a digital copy of each audio and video publication or recording issued by it for bibliographic listing and retention in the digital library.

(3)  Each state agency or political subdivision shall deposit with the division copies of audio and video publications or recordings issued by it in physical formats in the numbers specified by the state librarian for bibliographic listing and retention in the state library collection.

(4) (a)  The division shall publish or make available to the public through electronic networks a list of state agency publications.

(b)  The list shall be published periodically and distributed to depository libraries and the state archivist.

(5)  Materials the division considers not to be of major public interest will be listed, but no copies will be required for deposit.

